Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
179D

DAMS AND
RESERVOIRS

Part I. General Provisions

Section

179D-1 Short title

179D-2 Declaration of purpose

179D-3 Definitions

179D-4 Liability for damages

179D-5 Repealed

179D-6 General powers and duties of the board of
land and

natural resources

179D-7 Administrative and judicial review

179D-8 Violations; penalties

179D-9 Enactment of rules

Part II. Dam and Reservoir Safety

179D-21 Certificate of approval to impound

179D-22 Entry upon property

179D-23 Injunctive relief

179D-24 Emergency actions

179D-25 Establishment of dam and reservoir safety
special

fund

179D-26 Liens

179D-27 Dams and reservoirs completed prior to
July 6, 2007

179D-28 Dams and reservoirs under construction,
enlargement,

repair, alteration, or removal before
July 6, 2007

179D-29 Annual report

179D-30 Dam and reservoir owners; general
requirements and

responsibilities

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising under
this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next